Washington statutes.
RCW 43.150.040

Center for volunteerism and citizen service authorized—Coordinator—Staff.

The governor may establish a statewide center for volunteerism and citizen service within the department of commerce and appoint an executive administrator, who may employ such staff as necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. The provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW do not apply to the executive administrator and the staff.

[ 2023 c 470 s 2062; 1995 c 399 s 84; 1992 c 66 s 4; 1985 c 6 s 11; 1982 1st ex.s. c 11 s 4.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2023 c 470: See note following RCW 10.99.030.